Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.350

School employees' benefits board—Insurance benefits.

(1) A function of the school employees' benefits board established under RCW 41.05.740 is to design and approve insurance benefit plans and to establish eligibility criteria for participation in insurance benefit plans by January 1, 2020. In order for the school employees' benefits board to develop these benefit plans, charter school employees' information must be provided to the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority.

(2) Charter schools and their benefit providers must submit data to the health care authority in accordance with RCW 41.05.075(3).

(3) Any benefit provider offering a benefit plan by contract or agreement with a charter school must make available to the charter school the benefit plan descriptions and, where available, the demographic information on plan subscribers that the charter school and benefit providers are required to report to the health care authority under this section.

(4) Each charter school must:

(a) Carry out all actions required by the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority under chapter 41.05 RCW including, but not limited to, those actions necessary for the operation of benefit plans, education of employees, claims administration, and appeals process; and

(b) Report all data relating to employees eligible to participate in benefits or plans administered by the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority in a format designed and communicated by the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority.

[ 2018 c 260 s 24.]